Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 64

Military Justice

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-64-101. Territorial applicability.

This code applies to all persons while they are serving inside or outside the state.

Courts-martial may be convened and held in units of the organized militia while those units are serving outside the state with the same jurisdiction and powers as to persons subject to this code as if the proceedings were held inside the state, and offenses committed outside the state may be tried and punished either inside or outside the state.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 50; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-605; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 4.

12-64-102. Jurisdiction to try certain personnel.

Jurisdiction of courts-martial shall be coextensive with the jurisdiction provided for similar courts of the United States Army and United States Air Force while accounting for the differences in the types of duty status of members of the organized militia.

(1)A person discharged from the organized militia who is later charged with having fraudulently obtained his or her discharge is subject to trial by court-martial under this code.

A person convicted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this code committed before the fraudulent discharge.

No person who has deserted from the organized militia may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this code by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 48; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-603; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 4; 2019, No. 211, § 4.

12-64-103. [Repealed.]

(1)The Governor shall appoint an officer of the organized militia as State Judge Advocate subject to confirmation by the Senate.

To be eligible for appointment, an officer must be a member of the bar of the highest court of the state and must have been a member of the bar of the state for at least five (5) years.

The Governor shall consult the Adjutant General before making an appointment under this subsection.

The Adjutant General may appoint as many assistant state judge advocates as he or she shall deem necessary, which assistant state judge advocates shall be officers of the organized militia and members of the bar of the state.

The State Judge Advocate or his or her assistants shall make frequent inspections in the field in supervision of the administration of military justice.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 51; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-606; Acts 2015, No. 1100, § 10.

12-64-105. Oaths — Affidavits.

The following persons of the organized militia may administer oaths for those purposes of military administration, including military justice, and affidavits may be taken for those purposes before those persons who shall have the general powers of a notary public:

The signature without seal of any such person, together with the title of his or her office, is prima facie evidence of this authority.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 164; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-675; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 947.

12-64-106. [Repealed.]

(1)Sections 12-60-103, 12-64-102, 12-64-107, 12-64-109, 12-64-201 — 12-64-203, 12-64-205 — 12-64-207, 12-64-301, 12-64-302, 12-64-407, 12-64-410, 12-64-509, 12-64-601, and 12-64-801 — 12-64-848 of this code shall be carefully explained to every enlisted member at the time of his or her enlistment or transfer or induction into, or at the time of his or her order to duty in or with any of the forces of the organized militia or within thirty (30) days thereafter.

They shall also be explained annually to each unit of the organized militia.

A complete text of this code and of the rules prescribed by the Governor thereunder shall be made available to any member of the organized militia, upon his or her request, for his or her personal examination.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 165; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-676; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 948.

12-64-108. [Repealed.]

Any member of the organized militia who believes himself or herself wronged by his or her commanding officer, and who, upon due application to that commanding officer, is refused redress, may complain to any superior commissioned officer, who shall forward the complaint to the Governor or Adjutant General.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 166; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-677.

12-64-110. Appropriations — Department of the Military Fund Account-Military Justice Fund.

There shall be appropriated annually, for the Department of the Military, the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for the State Judge Advocate to pay for the administration of military justice.

For the foregoing purposes, there is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated the “Department of the Military Fund Account-Military Justice Fund”, from which expenses of military justice shall be paid in the amounts and manner prescribed by law.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “State Military Department Fund Account” for “Courts-Martial Fund” in the section heading; rewrote (a); and, in (b), inserted “Account-Military Justice Fund”, deleted “all” preceding “expenses”, and substituted “military justice” for “courts-martial”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department” in the section heading and in (b); substituted “Department of the Military” for “military department” in (a); and made stylistic changes.

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Code of Military Justice, see Commentaries Volume B.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers have authority to quell quarrels, frays, and disorders among persons subject to this code and to apprehend persons subject to this code who take part therein.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 170; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-681; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 5539.

Subchapter 2

— Apprehension and Restraint

12-64-201. Apprehension generally.

“Apprehension” is the taking of a person into custody.

Any person authorized by this code or by rules issued pursuant thereto to apprehend persons subject to this code, any marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to the provisions of this code, and any peace officer authorized to do so by law may do so upon reasonable belief that an offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 52; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-607; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 949.

12-64-202. Apprehension of deserters.

Any civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders upon the laws of the United States or of a state, territory, commonwealth, or possession, or the District of Columbia may summarily apprehend a deserter from the organized militia and deliver him or her into the custody of the organized militia. If an offender is apprehended outside the state, his or her return to the area must be in accordance with normal extradition procedures or reciprocal agreement.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 53; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-608.

12-64-203. Restraint.

Subject to the orders or rules of the Adjutant General, commanders of the organized militia may restrain persons under their jurisdiction to the same extent as military commanders in service to the United States.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 54; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-609; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 10; 2019, No. 315, § 950.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Restraint” for “Imposition of restraint” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

12-64-204. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning restraint of persons charged with offenses, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 11.The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 50, § 55; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-610.

12-64-205. Reports and receiving of prisoners.

No provost marshal, commander of a guard, master at arms, warden, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under this code may refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to his or her charge when the committing person furnishes a statement signed by him or her of the offenses charged against the prisoner.

Every commander of a guard, master at arms, warden, keeper, or officer of a city or county jail or of any other jail, penitentiary, or prison designated under this code, to whose charge a prisoner is committed, shall within twenty-four (24) hours after that commitment or as soon as he or she is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the offense charged against him or her, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

Cross References. Management of local jail populations, §12-41-503.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 56; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-611.

12-64-206. Pretrial restraint as punishment prohibited.

Pretrial restraint is not punishment and shall not be used as punishment.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 57; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-612; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 12.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “restraint as” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

12-64-207. Delivery of offenders to civil authorities.

Under such rules as may be prescribed under this code, a person on active militia duty who is accused of an offense against civil authority may be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial.

When delivery hereunder is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, the delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial, and the offender, after having answered to the civil authorities for his or her offense, shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to military custody for the completion of his or her sentence.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Code of Military Justice, see Commentaries Volume B.

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 656, § 4: Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present Arkansas law authorizing summary courts martial for the state's military personnel does not provide due process and that this act is immediately necessary to provide such process by allowing a full hearing before a general court martial. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 670, § 11: Apr. 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain disciplinary provisions of the state military code need to be strengthened; that this act results in the same and should be given effect prior to the 1985 annual training of the military personnel subject to the state military code; that April 1 is a reasonable date to expect that this act will have been passed by both houses and acted upon by the Governor and that a date certain is desirable for the effective date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after April 1, 1985.”

Acts 2007, No. 47, § 11: Feb. 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are many members of the Arkansas National Guard and Reserves that are serving in active duty in Iraq and Afghanistan in the war on terror; that it is critical that Arkansas law be updated and be consistent with federal law and rules; and that this act is necessary to eliminate confusion regarding out-dated and inconsistent provisions in the Military Code of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Upon officers of his or her command:

Withholding of privileges for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks;

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks; or

A fine or a forfeiture in an amount that does not exceed ten (10) days of the officer's base pay.

The payment or collection of the fine or the withholding of the forfeiture under this subdivision (a)(1)(C) shall not exceed an amount equal to five (5) days of base pay during any calendar month; or

Upon other military personnel of his or her command:

Withholding of privileges for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks;

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks;

Extra duties for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks and not to exceed two (2) hours per day, holidays included;

Reduction to next inferior grade if the grade from which demoted was established by the command or an equivalent or lower command;

If imposed upon a person attached to or embarked in a vessel, confinement for not more than seven (7) consecutive days; or

A fine or a forfeiture in an amount that does not exceed ten (10) days of the soldier's or airman's base pay.

The payment or collection of the fine or the withholding of the forfeiture under this subdivision (a)(2)(F) shall not exceed an amount equal to five (5) days of base pay during any calendar month.

Under such rules as the Governor may prescribe, a field grade commanding officer may, in addition to or in lieu of admonition or reprimand, impose not more than two (2) of the following disciplinary punishments for a minor offense without the intervention of a court-martial:

Withholding of privileges for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks;

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks; or

A fine or a forfeiture in an amount that does not exceed thirty (30) days of the officer's base pay.

The payment or collection of the fine or the withholding of the forfeiture under this subdivision (b)(1)(C) shall not exceed an amount equal to fifteen (15) days of base pay during any calendar month; or

Withholding of privileges for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks;

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks;

Extra duties for not more than two (2) consecutive weeks and not to exceed two (2) hours per day, holidays included;

Reduction to next inferior grade if the grade from which demoted was established by the command or an equivalent or lower command;

If imposed upon a person attached to or embarked in a vessel, confinement for not more than seven (7) consecutive days; or

A fine or a forfeiture in an amount that does not exceed thirty (30) days of the soldier's or airman's base pay.

The payment or collection of the fine or the withholding of the forfeiture under this subdivision (b)(2)(F) shall not exceed an amount equal to fifteen (15) days of base pay during any calendar month.

However, except in the case where confinement has not been excluded as a punishment option, a member of the organized militia may not demand trial by court-martial in lieu of nonjudicial punishment.

The Governor or commanding general may, by order or rule, place limitations on the powers granted by this subchapter with respect to the kind and amount of punishment authorized and the categories of commanding officers authorized to exercise those powers.

An officer in charge of a detached unit or section may, for minor offenses, impose on officers, soldiers, or airmen assigned to the unit of which he or she is in charge the punishment authorized to be imposed by commanding officers as the Governor or commanding general may by order or rule specifically prescribe, as provided in subsections (a)-(d) of this section.

Whenever nonjudicial punishment of forfeiture of an amount of base pay is imposed under this section, the forfeiture may apply to the base pay only and before any deduction, withholding, assignment, or forfeiture then due or becoming due on or after the date that punishment is imposed and to any pay accrued before that date.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (c); in (d) and (e), inserted “or commanding general” following “Governor” and inserted “order or” preceding “regulation”; and substituted “An officer in charge” for “A field grade officer in charge or executive officer” in (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” and made similar changes in (a), the introductory language of (b), and in (d) and (e).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 58; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-613; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 951.

Subchapter 3

— Nonjudicial Punishment

12-64-301. Nonjudicial punishment generally.

Under such rules as the Governor may prescribe, a company grade commanding officer may, in addition to or in lieu of admonition or reprimand, impose not more than two (2) of the following disciplinary punishments for minor offenses without the intervention of a court-martial:

Upon officers of his or her command:

Upon other military personnel of his or her command:

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 59; 1981, No. 656, § 1; 1985, No. 670, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-614; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 5; 2015, No. 1003, § 13; 2019, No. 315, § 952.

12-64-302. Appeal.

A person punished under this subchapter who considers his or her punishment unjust or disproportionate to the offense may, through the proper channel, appeal to the next superior authority.

The appeal shall be promptly forwarded and decided, but the person punished may in the meantime be required to undergo the punishment adjudged.

The officer who imposes the punishment, his or her successor in command, and superior authority may suspend, set aside, or remit any part or amount of the punishment and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 59; 1981, No. 656, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-614.

12-64-303. Court-martial not barred.

The imposition and enforcement of disciplinary punishment under this subchapter for any act or omission is not a bar to trial by court-martial for a serious crime or offense growing out of the same act or omission and not properly punishable under this subchapter. However, the fact that a disciplinary punishment has been enforced may be shown by the accused upon trial, and when so shown shall be considered in determining the measure of punishment to be adjudged in the event of a finding of guilty.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 59; 1981, No. 656, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-614.

Subchapter 4

— Courts-Martial

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Code of Military Justice, see Commentaries Volume B.

Cross References. Pay of personnel serving on courts-martial, §12-62-302.

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 656, § 4: Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present Arkansas law authorizing summary courts-martial for the state's military personnel does not provide due process and that this act is immediately necessary to provide such due process by allowing a full hearing before a general court-martial. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 670, § 11: Apr. 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain disciplinary provisions of the state military code need to be strengthened; that this act results in the same and should be given effect prior to the 1985 annual training of the military personnel subject to the state military code; that April 1 is a reasonable date to expect that this act will have been passed by both houses and acted upon by the Governor and that a date certain is desirable for the effective date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediatley necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after April 1, 1985.”

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, § 3: June 22, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 670 of 1985 which amended various provisions of the Arkansas Military Justice Code inadvertently omitted from the law language concerning the rights of persons charged with court-martial offenses; that it is essential that such language be reinstated in order to assure that those persons charged with court-martial offenses receive due process of law; that this act is designed to reinstate the language inadvertently omitted in the 1985 Act and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 47, § 11: Feb. 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are many members of the Arkansas National Guard and Reserves that are serving in active duty in Iraq and Afghanistan in the war on terror; that it is critical that Arkansas law be updated and be consistent with federal law and rules; and that this act is necessary to eliminate confusion regarding out-dated and inconsistent provisions in the Military Code of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 211, § 23: Feb. 26, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the removal of officers whoare substandard in performance of duty or in conduct, deficient in character,or unsuited for military service is of paramount importance to the good orderand discipline of the Arkansas National Guard and security of the State ofArkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act beingimmediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

12-64-401. Classifications of courts-martial.

There shall be three (3) kinds of courts-martial in each of the forces of the organized militia, namely:

General courts-martial, which shall consist of:

A military judge and:

Any number of members not less than eight (8); or

Six (6) or seven (7) members if after impanelment as required by subdivision (1)(A)(i) of this section there are challenges or excusals; or

Only a military judge, if before the court is assembled the accused, knowing the identity of the military judge and after consultation with defense counsel, requests orally on the record or in writing a court composed only of a military judge and the military judge approves;

Special courts-martial, consisting of:

A military judge and not less than four (4) members; or

Only a military judge, if one has been detailed to the court, and the accused, under the conditions prescribed in subdivision (1)(B) of this section, so requests, or if referred by the convening authority under the United States Uniform Code of Military Justice, 10 U.S.C. § 801 et seq., subject to applicable limitations; and

Summary courts-martial which shall consist of one (1) officer.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “not less than eight (8); or” for “not less than five (5)” in (1)(A)(i); added (1)(A)(ii); deleted former (2)(A) and redesignated (2)(B) and (C) as (2)(C) and (D), respectively; substituted “not less than four (4); or” for “not less than three (3)” in (2)(A); and inserted “or if referred by the convening authority under the United States Uniform Code of Military Justice, 10 U.S.C. § 801 et seq., subject to applicable limitations” in (2)(B).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 60; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-615; Acts 1987, No. 125, § 1; 2019, No. 211, § 5.

12-64-402. Jurisdiction generally.

Each force of the organized militia has court-martial jurisdiction and powers over all persons subject to this code and shall follow the forms and procedures provided for similar courts of the United States Army and United States Air Force unless specifically enumerated in the Arkansas Code or by the Governor as the chief executive officer and Commander-in-Chief of the organized militia.

The exercise of jurisdiction by one force over personnel of another force shall be in accordance with rules prescribed by the Governor.

The jurisdiction of the military courts and boards established by this code shall be presumed and the burden of proof rests on any person seeking to oust those courts or boards of jurisdiction in any action or proceeding.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), inserted “and powers” and added “and shall follow the forms and procedures provided for similar courts of the United States Army and United States Air Force.”

The 2019 amendment by No. 211 added “unless specifically enumerated in the Arkansas Code or by the Governor as the chief executive officer and Commander-in-Chief of the organized militia” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 61, 173; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-616, 11-684; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 14; 2019, No. 211, § 6;
2019, No. 315, § 953.

12-64-403. General courts-martial punishments.

General courts-martial may, under such limitations as the Governor may prescribe, adjudge one (1) or more of the following punishments for each specification:

Confinement with hard labor that shall not exceed the lowest sentence limitations established in the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States (2019 Edition), as it existed on January 1, 2019, for the offense or three hundred sixty-five (365) days;

A fine or forfeiture in an amount that shall not exceed the lowest sentence limitations established in the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States (2019 Edition), as it existed on January 1, 2019, for the offense or three hundred sixty-five (365) days of the service member's base pay and allowances;

Dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or dismissal;

Reprimand; and

Reduction of enlisted persons to a lower grade.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “General courts-martial punishments” for “Jurisdiction of general courts-martial” in the section heading; in the introductory language, deleted “Subject to §12-64-402” at the beginning, deleted “have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code and” following “courts-martial”, and substituted “one (1) or more” for “any”; and deleted (6).

The 2019 amendment added “for each specification” in the introductory language; and rewrote (1) and (2).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 62; 1985, No. 670, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-617; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 8; 2015, No. 1003, § 14; 2019, No. 211, § 7.

12-64-404. Special courts-martial punishments.

A special court-martial may, under such limitations as the Governor may prescribe, adjudge one (1) or more of the following punishments:

Confinement with hard labor that shall not exceed the lowest of the sentence limitations established in the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States (2019 Edition), as it existed on January 1, 2019, for the offense or one hundred eighty (180) days;

A fine or forfeiture of pay and allowances in an amount that shall not exceed the lowest of the sentence limitations established in the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States (2019 Edition), as it existed on January 1, 2019, for the offense or one hundred eighty (180) days of the service member's base pay and allowances;

Bad conduct discharge;

Reprimand; and

Reduction of enlisted persons to a lower grade.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Special courts-martial punishments” for “Jurisdiction of special courts-martial” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “that shall not exceed the lowest of the sentence limitations established in the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States (2019 Edition), as it existed on January 1, 2019, for the offense or one hundred eighty (180) days” for “for not more than one hundred (100) days” in (1); and substituted “the lowest of the sentence limitations established in the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States (2019 Edition), as it existed on January 1, 2019, for the offense or one hundred eighty (180) days” for “one hundred (100) days” in (2).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 63; 1985, No. 670, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-618; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 9; 2015, No. 1003, § 14; 2019, No. 211, § 8.

12-64-405. Summary courts-martial punishments.

Officers and warrant officers may not be tried by summary courts-martial.

No person with respect to whom summary courts-martial have jurisdiction may be brought to trial before a summary court-martial if he or she objects thereto. If objection to a trial by summary court-martial is made by an accused, trial may be ordered by special or general court-martial as may be appropriate.

A summary court-martial may, under such limitations as the Governor may prescribe, adjudge one (1) or more of the following punishments:

Confinement with hard labor not exceeding thirty (30) days;

A fine or forfeiture of pay and allowances in an amount that shall not exceed thirty (30) days of the service member's base pay and allowances;

Reprimand; and

Reduction of enlisted persons to a lower grade.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Summary courts-martial punishments” for “Jurisdiction of summary courts-martial” in the section heading; rewrote (a); in the introductory language of (c), inserted “under such limitations as the Governor may prescribe” and substituted “one (1) or more” for “any”; and deleted (c)(5).

The 2019 amendment substituted “thirty (30) days” for “twenty-five (25) days” in (c)(1); and substituted “thirty (30) days” for “one hundred (100) days” in (c)(2).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), inserted “special, and summary” and added “or the commanding general of the organized militia”; in (b), added “Special courts-martial may be convened by the” and deleted “may convene special courts-martial” following “command”; deleted (b)(2); added “Summary courts-martial may be convened by” in (c)(1); deleted former (c)(2) and redesignated “The proceedings shall be informal” as present (c)(2); and deleted (c)(3).

The 2017 amendment, in (c)(1), inserted “consisting of one (1) commissioned officer”, substituted “troops are on” for “troops on”, and deleted “may convene a summary court-marital consisting of one (1) commissioned officer” at the end.

After such a request, the accused may not be tried by a general or special court-martial the membership of which does not include enlisted members in a number comprising at least one-third (1/3) of the total membership of the court unless eligible members cannot be obtained on account of physical conditions or military exigencies.

If such members cannot be obtained, the court may be convened and the trial held without them, but the convening authority shall make a detailed written statement to be appended to the record stating why they could not be obtained.

In this subsection the word, “unit” means any regularly organized body of the organized militia not larger than a company, a squadron, or a body corresponding to one of them.

When it can be avoided, no person subject to this code shall be tried by a court-martial any member of which is junior to him or her in rank or grade.

When convening a court-martial, the convening authority shall detail as members thereof such members as in his or her opinion are best qualified for the duty by reason of age, education, training, experience, length of service, and judicial temperament.

No member is eligible to serve as a member of a general or special court-martial when he or she is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “who is not a member of the same unit as the accused” following “militia” in (c)(1)(A).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning appointment of president of a special court-martial, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 15.The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 50, § 71; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-626; Acts 1987, No. 125, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), inserted “and special” and deleted the former second sentence; deleted (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in (c), deleted “of a general court-martial” following “judge”, substituted “detailed” for “designated”, and deleted “or his designee in accordance with such regulations as may be prescribed under subsection (a) of this section” following “Advocate”; and deleted the former second sentence of (d).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “and such assistance as he considers appropriate” at the end of (a); in (b), inserted the (3) designation and made stylistic changes; and deleted (c) and (d).

The 2019 amendment added (c).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “or court of inquiry” following “court-martial” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 211 added (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a); and inserted “rules or” preceding “regulations” in (b).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “military judge” for “president” in (a); in (b), substituted “a similarly appointed marshall” for “such marshals”, “the military judge” for “such president”, and “imposed or authorized by this code” for “by this code imposed on or authorized”; and deleted (c).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 64; 1981, No. 656, § 2; 1985, No. 670, § 8; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-619; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 10; 2015, No. 1003, § 14; 2019, No. 211, § 9.

12-64-406. Convening courts-martial.

General, special, and summary courts-martial may be convened by the Governor or the commanding general of the organized militia.

Special courts-martial may be convened by the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base, or other place where troops are on duty, or of a brigade, regiment, wing, group, detached battalion, separate squadron, or other detached command.

(1)Summary courts-martial consisting of one (1) commissioned officer may be convened by the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base, or other place where the troops are on duty, or of a brigade, regiment, wing, group, detached battalion, squadron, company, or other detachment.

The proceedings shall be informal.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 68-70; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-623 – 11-625; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 14;
2017, No. 250, § 29.

12-64-407. Service on courts-martial.

Any commissioned officer of or on duty with the organized militia is eligible to serve on all courts-martial for the trial of any person who may lawfully be brought before such courts for trial.

Any warrant officer of or on duty with the organized militia is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any person, other than a commissioned officer, who may lawfully be brought before such courts for trial.

(1)(A)Any enlisted member of the organized militia is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any enlisted member who may lawfully be brought before such courts for trial, but he or she shall serve as a member of a court only if before the convening of the court the accused personally has requested in writing that enlisted members serve on it.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 71; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-626; 2019, No. 211, § 10.

12-64-408. [Repealed.]

A military judge shall be detailed to each general and special court-martial.

The military judge shall be a commissioned officer who is a member of the bar of the highest court of a state or a member of the bar of a federal court and who is certified to be qualified for that duty by the State Judge Advocate.

The military judge shall be detailed by the State Judge Advocate.

Neither the convening authority nor any member of his or her staff shall prepare or review any report concerning the effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency of the military judge so detailed which relates to his or her performance of duty as a military judge.

No person shall be eligible to act as military judge in a case if he or she is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating officer or as a counsel in the same case.

The military judge of a court-martial may not consult with the members of the court, except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel, nor may he or she vote with the members of the court.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 72; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-627; Acts 1987, No. 125, § 3; 2015, No. 1003, § 16.

12-64-410. Trial and defense counsel.

For each general and special court-martial, the authority convening the court shall detail trial counsel and defense counsel.

(1)A person who has acted as investigating officer, military judge, or court member in any case shall not later act as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, or, unless expressly requested by the accused, defense counsel or assistant defense counsel in the same case.

A person who has acted for the prosecution shall not act later in the same case for the defense.

A person who has acted for the defense shall not act later in the same case for the prosecution.

(1)If a victim of a crime committed subject to this code has a special victims' counsel provided at the expense of an appropriate government agency, the special victims' counsel shall be afforded all of the rights and privileges offered to counsel at similar courts of the United States Army and the United States Air Force.

A judge advocate certified to practice before military courts is fully certified and qualified to serve as a special victims' counsel for the courts convened under this code, without regard to the judge advocate's licensing state.

Any counsel furnished at the expense of the United States Government or the state government shall be qualified to serve as a special victims' counsel under this section and, if qualified, shall be exempt from any fees or additional requirements.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 73; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-628; Acts 1987, No. 125, § 4; 2015, No. 1003, § 16; 2019, No. 211, § 11.